Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska77-5413
Application; filing deadline.

There shall be no project applications filed on or after July 1, 2004, except that all project applications and all project agreements pending, approved, or entered into before such date shall continue in full force and effect.

Laws 2000, LB 936, § 13.